New York, session 2025-2026, S1912.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 365-a of the social services law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (nn) to read as follows: 3 (nn) medically tailored meals and medical nutrition therapy. As used 4 in this paragraph, "medically tailored meals and medical nutrition ther- 5 apy" means nutritional assessment, nutritional therapy, and nutritional 6 counseling provided by a certified dietician or certified nutritionist, 7 and the provision of any food indicated by such assessment, therapy or 8 counseling and, ordered by a health care professional acting within 9 their lawful scope of practice under title eight of the education law, 10 for the purpose of treating one or more chronic conditions for an indi- 11 vidual who is limited in their activities of daily living; and provided 12 that there is federal financial participation in the costs of services 13 provided under this paragraph. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the commissioner of 16 health shall adopt regulations and take other actions reasonably neces- 17 sary to implement this act on that date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04026-02-5